Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 02. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 08.02.010.
Professional designation requirements.

An acupuncturist licensed under AS 08.06, an audiologist or speech-language pathologist licensed under AS 08.11, a behavior analyst licensed under AS 08.15, a person licensed in the state as a chiropractor under AS 08.20, a professional counselor licensed under AS 08.29, a dentist under AS 08.36, a dietitian or nutritionist licensed under AS 08.38, a massage therapist licensed under AS 08.61, a marital and family therapist licensed under AS 08.63, a medical practitioner or osteopath under AS 08.64, a direct-entry midwife certified under AS 08.65, a registered or advanced practice registered nurse under AS 08.68, an optometrist under AS 08.72, a licensed pharmacist under AS 08.80, a physical therapist or occupational therapist licensed under AS 08.84, a psychologist under AS 08.86, or a clinical social worker licensed under AS 08.95, shall use as professional identification appropriate letters or a title after that person’s name that represents the person’s specific field of practice. The letters or title shall appear on all signs, stationery, or other advertising in which the person offers or displays personal professional services to the public. In addition, a person engaged in the practice of medicine or osteopathy as defined in AS

08.64.380

, or a person engaged in any manner in the healing arts who diagnoses, treats, tests, or counsels other persons in relation to human health or disease and uses the letters “M.D.” or the title “doctor” or “physician” or another title that tends to show that the person is willing or qualified to diagnose, treat, test, or counsel another person, shall clarify the letters or title by adding the appropriate specialist designation, if any, such as “dermatologist,” “radiologist,” “audiologist,” “naturopath,” or the like.

A person subject to (a) of this section who fails to comply with the requirements of (a) of this section shall be given notice of noncompliance by that person’s appropriate licensing board or, if the person is not regulated by a board, by the department. If, after a reasonable time, with opportunity for a hearing, the person’s noncompliance continues, the board or department, as appropriate, may suspend or revoke the person’s license or registration, or administer other disciplinary action which in its determination is appropriate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 6 SLA 1973; am § 11 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 6 ch 131 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am § 4 ch 126 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 1989; am § 5 ch 6 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 129 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 130 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 1996; am § 5 ch 32 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 67 SLA 1999; am § 4 ch 42 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 41 SLA 2014; am § 2 ch 114, SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, in (a), inserted “a behavior analyst licensed under AS 08.15” following “speech-language pathologist licensed under AS 08.11.”, and made stylistic changes.

The second 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), inserted “a massage therapist licensed under AS 08.61,” following “a dietician or nutritionist licensed under AS 08.38,”.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (a) inserted “or advanced practice registered” preceding “nurse”.

Sec. 08.02.011.
Professional geologist.

The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development shall certify an applicant as a professional geologist if the applicant is certified as a professional geologist by the American Institute of Professional Geologists.

History.

(§ 2 ch 142 SLA 1980)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 08.53.010. Renumbered in 1980.

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 08.02.020.
Limitation of liability.

An action may not be brought against a person for damages resulting from

the person’s good faith performance of a duty, function, or activity required as a

member of, or witness before, a licensing board or peer review committee established to review a licensing matter;

member of a committee appointed under AS

08.64.336(c)

;

contractor or agent of a contractor under AS

08.01.050(d)

or AS

08.64.101(a)(5)

;

a recommendation or action in accordance with the prescribed duties of a licensing board, peer review committee established to review a licensing matter, committee appointed under AS

08.64.336(c)

, or contractor or agent of a contractor under AS

08.01.050(d)

or AS

08.64.101(a)(5)

when the person acts in the reasonable belief that the action or recommendation is warranted by facts known to the person, board, peer review committee, committee appointed under AS

08.64.336(c)

, or contractor or agent of the contractor under AS

08.01.050(d)

or AS

08.64.101(a)(5)

after reasonable efforts to ascertain the facts upon which the action or recommendation is made; or

a report made in good faith to a public agency by the person, or participation by the person in an investigation by a public agency or a judicial or administrative proceeding relating to the report, if the report relates to the abuse of alcohol, other drugs, or other substances by a person licensed by a board listed in AS

08.01.050(d)

.

History.

(§ 45 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 12 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 126 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 34 SLA 1992)

Revisor's notes. —

In 1998 and 2018, references to AS

08.64.101

in this section were corrected to reflect renumbering and relettering in that section.

Sec. 08.02.025.
Compliance with student loan requirements. [Repealed, § 18 ch 54 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 08.02.030.
[Renumbered as AS 08.01.062.]

Sec. 08.02.040.
Access to certain mental health information and records by the state.

Notwithstanding AS

08.29.200

, AS

08.63.200

, AS

08.86.200

, AS

08.95.900

, another provision of this title, or a regulation adopted under this title, a licensee or an entity employing or contracting with a licensee may disclose confidential patient mental health information, communications, and records to the Department of Health and Social Services when disclosure is authorized under AS

47.30.540

,

47.30.590

,

47.30.845

, or AS

47.31.032

. Information, communications, and records received by the Department of Health and Social Services under this section are confidential medical records of patients and are not open to public inspection and copying under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

.

In this section, “licensee” has the meaning given in AS

08.01.110

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 74 SLA 2001)

Sec. 08.02.050.
Permits for use of drugs to euthanize domestic animals.

A qualified agency may apply to the department and obtain a permit that authorizes the purchase, possession, and use by the agency of sodium pentobarbital, sodium pentobarbital with lidocaine, and other drugs authorized in regulations adopted by the department for the purpose of euthanizing injured, sick, or abandoned domestic animals in the lawful possession of the agency. To qualify to obtain the permit, the agency shall certify that it will

comply with applicable federal laws related to the use of the drugs; and

not permit an employee to administer the drugs unless the employee has successfully completed a euthanasia technician certification course approved by the National Animal Control Association, the American Humane Association, or the Humane Society of the United States.

The department may revoke or suspend a permit or take another disciplinary action under AS

08.01.075

if it determines that the agency or an employee of the agency

improperly used sodium pentobarbital, sodium pentobarbital with lidocaine, or another drug authorized for use under this section;

failed to follow federal or state laws regarding proper storage and handling of the drugs;

allowed an employee to administer the drugs before the employee successfully completed the certification course described in (a)(2) of this section; or

violated this title or a regulation adopted under this title.

In this section, “agency” means an animal control agency of a municipality or recognized governmental entity or an entity that has contracted with a municipality or recognized governmental entity to perform animal control or animal euthanasia services.

The department may adopt regulations to implement this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 08.02.090.
Definition.

In this chapter, “department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 2 ch 8 SLA 2011)